Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2377YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 229 Section 1. Section 708.11A, Code 2025, is amended by 1 striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the 2 following: 3 708.11A Unauthorized placement of global positioning device. 4 1. A person shall not place a global positioning device or 5 a device equipped with global positioning technology on a motor 6 vehicle owned or leased by another person without the consent 7 of the other person. 8 2. A person shall not intentionally obtain information 9 regarding the movement or location of another person from a 10 global positioning device or a device equipped with global 11 positioning technology that has been placed without the consent 12 of the other person. 13 3. This section does not apply to any of the following: 14 a. A manufacturer, as defined in section 321.1, or a 15 person acting within the scope of the personâs employment, who 16 installs an in-vehicle communication or telematics system. 17 b. A device installed by or with the permission of the 18 vehicle owner for automobile insurance rating, underwriting, or 19 claims handling purposes. 20 c. A peace officer acting within the officerâs scope of 21 employment pursuant to section 808.4A. 22 d. A parent or guardian tracking the movement or location of 23 the parentâs minor child or guardianâs ward. 24 e. An employer or business owner tracking the movement or 25 location of a motor vehicle owned, leased, or assigned for use 26 by the employer or business owner. 27 f. A person tracking the movement or location of a device 28 included within the personâs shared cellular communications 29 service plan. 30 4. A person who violates this section commits a serious 31 misdemeanor. 32